Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,198
Collection system; departments implement.

The Department of Revenue, the Department of Administrative Services, and the Department of Labor shall develop and implement a collection system to carry out the intent of section 77-27,197.

Laws 1993, LB 46, § 2.